Virginia statutes. Title 17.1. Courts of Record.
Article 4. Electronic Filing.

§§ 17.1-255,
17.1-256.
Expired.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, c. 674, which enacted this section, in cl. 2, as amended by Acts 1998, c. 651, provides for the expiration of this section July 1, 2004.

§ 17.1-257.
Repealed by Acts 2000, c. 800, cl. 2.

§ 17.1-258.
Expired.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, c. 674, which enacted this section, in cl. 2, as amended by Acts 1998, c. 651, provides for the expiration of this section July 1, 2004.

§ 17.1-258.1.
Repealed by Acts 2003, c. 127, cl. 2.